src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/uk.aff
SFX i Y 47
SFX i       
SFX i 0   [^ ][  ] 
SFX i     [^          ].  
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i      [          ]   
SFX i 0 '  [^ ][  ] 
SFX i 0   [     ] 
SFX i 0 '  [  ]  
SFX i 0   [^          ][    ] 
SFX i 0    [          ]  
SFX i 0    [          ]  
SFX i 0    [          ]  
SFX i       
SFX i       
SFX i        
SFX i     [^  ]  
SFX i          
SFX i           
SFX i     [^    ]  
SFX i     [^    ]  
SFX i      [^    ]  
SFX i     [^    ]  
SFX i     [    ]  
SFX i     [    ]  
SFX i      [    ]  
SFX i     [    ]  
SFX i       
SFX i        
SFX i     [^' ]  
SFX i     [' ]  
SFX i           
SFX i           
SFX i          
SFX i            
SFX i            
SFX i          
SFX i      [   ]  
SFX i      [   ]  
SFX i     [   ]  
SFX i      [   ]  
SFX i       [  ]  
SFX i       [  ]  
SFX i      [  ]  
SFX j Y 65
SFX j        
SFX j        
SFX j         
SFX j        
SFX j 0    [    ] 
SFX j 0    [    ] 
SFX j 0     [    ] 
SFX j 0    [    ] 
SFX j 0    [  ]  
SFX j 0    [  ]  
SFX j 0     [  ]  
SFX j 0    [  ]  
SFX j 0      
SFX j 0      
SFX j 0       
SFX j 0      
SFX j       
SFX j           
SFX j   0 [^ ]   
SFX j       [^       ]   
SFX j   0 [       ]   
SFX j   0 [^  ]  
SFX j        
SFX j         
SFX j        
SFX j      [^     ]  
SFX j      [^    ]  
SFX j       [^    ]  
SFX j      [^    ]  
SFX j               
SFX j        [^ ]     
SFX j          
SFX j             
SFX j             
SFX j        [^    ]   
SFX j   0 [   ]  
SFX j 0      
SFX j      [    ]  
SFX j       [    ]  
SFX j      [    ]  
SFX j      '  
SFX j          
SFX j      [ ]    
SFX j    0 [^ ]    
SFX j          
SFX j     [^ ]   
SFX j          
SFX j     [^ ]   
SFX j          
SFX j    0     
SFX j    0     
SFX j          
SFX j         
SFX j        
SFX j         
SFX j          
SFX j           
SFX j        
SFX j        
SFX j         
SFX j   0    
SFX j    0    
SFX j          
SFX j           
SFX j          
SFX k Y 8
SFX k       
SFX k 0   [   ] 
SFX k 0   [^ ]  
SFX k         
SFX k          
SFX k          
SFX k         
SFX k          
SFX l Y 39
SFX l          [  ]    
SFX l       [  ]    
SFX l             
SFX l          
SFX l             
SFX l          
SFX l        [^ ]   
SFX l            
SFX l           
SFX l 0       
SFX l 0       
SFX l                
SFX l                 
SFX l     [^  ]    
SFX l         
SFX l 0    [^'][  ] 
SFX l 0    [^'][  ] 
SFX l 0   [  ] 
SFX l 0     '  
SFX l 0     '  
SFX l '      [^ ]'  
SFX l '       [^ ]'  
SFX l                  
SFX l                  
SFX l                    
SFX l                   
SFX l                  
SFX l                  
SFX l                  
SFX l                    
SFX l                   
SFX l                  
SFX l 0      
SFX l 0       
SFX l 0        
SFX l 0   [   ]  
SFX l 0     [   ]  
SFX l 0    [   ]  
SFX l 0   [   ]  
SFX m Y 66
SFX m           [  ]    
SFX m           [  ]    
SFX m            [  ]    
SFX m           [  ]    
SFX m              
SFX m              
SFX m               
SFX m              
SFX m         [^ ]   
SFX m         [^ ]   
SFX m          [^ ]   
SFX m         [^ ]   
SFX m             
SFX m             
SFX m              
SFX m             
SFX m            
SFX m            
SFX m             
SFX m            
SFX m                 
SFX m                 
SFX m                  
SFX m                 
SFX m                  
SFX m                  
SFX m                   
SFX m                  
SFX m      [^  ]    
SFX m      [^  ]    
SFX m       [^  ]    
SFX m      [^  ]    
SFX m 0    [^'][  ] 
SFX m 0   [^'][  ] 
SFX m 0     [^'][  ] 
SFX m 0      [^'][  ] 
SFX m 0     [^'][  ] 
SFX m 0     '  
SFX m 0    '  
SFX m 0      '  
SFX m 0       '  
SFX m 0      '  
SFX m '      [^ ]'  
SFX m '     [^ ]'  
SFX m '       [^ ]'  
SFX m '        [^ ]'  
SFX m '       [^ ]'  
SFX m                  
SFX m                   
SFX m                   
SFX m                    
SFX m                   
SFX m                  
SFX m                   
SFX m                   
SFX m                    
SFX m                   
SFX m 0      
SFX m 0       
SFX m 0       
SFX m 0        
SFX m 0       
SFX m 0    [   ]  
SFX m 0    [   ]  
SFX m 0     [   ]  
SFX m 0    [   ]  
SFX n Y 9
SFX n          [  ]    
SFX n             
SFX n        [^ ]   
SFX n            
SFX n           
SFX n                
SFX n                 
SFX n      [^  ]    
SFX n 0   [    ]  
SFX q Y 2
SFX q 0      
SFX q 0   [   ]  
SFX p Y 182
SFX p            
SFX p           
SFX p             
SFX p           
SFX p             
SFX p               
SFX p           
SFX p           
SFX p              
SFX p            
SFX p             
SFX p           
SFX p              
SFX p              
SFX p               
SFX p              
SFX p      [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p       [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p       [^ ]  
SFX p         [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p         [^ ]  
SFX p       [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p         [^ ]  
SFX p        [^ ]  
SFX p      [^  ]  
SFX p       [^  ]  
SFX p       [^  ]  
SFX p         [^  ]  
SFX p        [^  ]  
SFX p       [^  ]  
SFX p        [  ]  
SFX p         [  ]  
SFX p         [  ]  
SFX p           [  ]  
SFX p          [  ]  
SFX p         [  ]  
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p           
SFX p          
SFX p        [^  ]  
SFX p        [^  ]  
SFX p         [^  ]  
SFX p        [^  ]  
SFX p          [  ]  
SFX p          [  ]  
SFX p           [  ]  
SFX p          [  ]  
SFX p              
SFX p              
SFX p               
SFX p              
SFX p               
SFX p                 
SFX p              
SFX p              
SFX p                
SFX p               
SFX p               
SFX p              
SFX p                
SFX p                
SFX p                 
SFX p                
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p             [  ]   
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p             [  ]   
SFX p               [  ]   
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p              [  ]   
SFX p             [  ]   
SFX p             [  ]   
SFX p            [  ]   
SFX p              [  ]   
SFX p              [  ]   
SFX p               [  ]   
SFX p              [  ]   
SFX p            
SFX p            
SFX p             
SFX p            
SFX p             
SFX p               
SFX p            
SFX p            
SFX p              
SFX p             
SFX p             
SFX p            
SFX p              
SFX p              
SFX p               
SFX p              
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p           
SFX p          
SFX p           
SFX p             
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p            
SFX p           
SFX p           
SFX p          
SFX p            
SFX p            
SFX p             
SFX p            
SFX p 0      [^             ] 
SFX p 0      [^               ] 
SFX p 0       [^             ] 
SFX p 0      [^               ] 
SFX p 0       [^             ] 
SFX p 0         [^             ] 
SFX p 0      [^               ] 
SFX p 0      [^               ] 
SFX p 0        [^             ] 
SFX p 0       [^               ] 
SFX p 0       [^             ] 
SFX p 0      [^               ] 
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p           
SFX p          
SFX p 0        [^             ] 
SFX p 0        [^             ] 
SFX p 0         [^             ] 
SFX p 0        [^             ] 
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p          
SFX p           
SFX p          
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0       [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0       [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0         [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0        [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0       [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0       [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0        [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0        [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0         [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0        [^ ][   ] 
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0       [^ ]    
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0       [^ ]    
SFX p 0         [^ ]    
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0        [^ ]    
SFX p 0       [^ ]    
SFX p 0       [^ ]    
SFX p 0      [^ ]    
SFX p 0        [^ ]    
SFX p 0        [^ ]    
SFX p 0         [^ ]    
SFX p 0        [^ ]    
